Utah statutes.
11-3-10.   Exemptions -- Limitation on chapter.

(1)  This chapter does not apply to class A, class B, and class C explosives that are not for use in Utah, but are manufactured, stored, warehoused, or in transit for destinations outside of Utah.

(2)  This chapter does not supersede Section 23-13-7, regarding use of fireworks and explosives by the Division of Wildlife Resources and federal game agents.

(3)  Provided that the display operators are properly licensed as required by Section 53-7-223, municipalities and counties for the unincorporated areas within the county may conduct, permit, or regulate:

(a)  exhibitions of display fireworks; or

(b)  pyrotechnic displays held inside public buildings.

